DTC P2148 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1957800

DTC P2148

Fuel injector supply voltages circuit high input

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the fuel injector circuit voltage while the engine switch is on. If the PCM detects the circuit voltage is more then threshold when the fuel injector does not inject the fuel, the PCM determines that there is a malfunction in the fuel injector circuit.
Diagnostic support note
•  The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition during the first drive cycle.
•  The FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
•  The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Connector or terminal malfunction
•  Open circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.1 terminal B and PCM terminal 42
•  Open circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
•  Open circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.3 terminal B and PCM terminal 23
•  Open circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.4 terminal B and PCM terminal 40
•  Open in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.1 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Open in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.2 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Open in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.3 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Open in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.4 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Short to power circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.1 terminal B and PCM terminal 42
•  Short to power circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
•  Short to power circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.3 terminal B and PCM terminal 23
•  Short to power circuit in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.4 terminal B and PCM terminal 40
•  Short to power in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.1 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Short to power in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.2 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Short to power in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.3 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  Short to power in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.4 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
•  PCM malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform the repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
•  Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Is the PENDING CODE for this DTC present?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
4
INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Inspect for poor connection fuel injector for each cylinder (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to Step 9.
No
Go to the next step.
5
INSPECT FUEL INJECTORS CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Disconnect the PCM connector.
•  Inspect the voltage between following terminals (wiring harness-side) and body ground:
―  Fuel injector No.1 terminal B
―  Fuel injector No.2 terminal B
―  Fuel injector No.3 terminal B
―  Fuel injector No.4 terminal B
―  All fuel injector terminals A
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Repair or replace the wiring harness for a short to power supply for the suspected cylinder, then go to Step 9.
No
Go to the next step.
6
INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR
•  Inspect the fuel injector.
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Replace the fuel injector, then go to Step 9.
No
Go to the next step.
7
INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Inspect for poor connection. (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to Step 9.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Inspect for continuity between following terminals (wiring harness-side harness):
―  Fuel injector No.1 terminal B and PCM terminal 42
―  Fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
―  Fuel injector No.3 terminal B and PCM terminal 23
―  Fuel injector No.4 terminal B and PCM terminal 40
―  All fuel injector terminals A and PCM terminal 4
•  Is there continuity?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the wiring harness for the suspected circuit, then go to the next step.
9
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P2148 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Clear the DTC using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Is the PENDING CODE for this DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
10
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
•  Are any DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC troubleshooting.
No
Troubleshooting completed.